Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 29 Special District Elections Act

Cross references. —

For the Resort District Act, see Title 18, Chapter 16.

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 4, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S. 22-29-103(d) as created in section 1 of this act, rules, regulations, ordinances or bylaws duly adopted before January 1, 1995, by districts which are subject to this act are effective through March 31, 1995, without the requirements of filing. Nothing in this act shall affect the validity of contracts or other obligations of districts created before January 1, 1995.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 8 to 13.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 73, 74.